District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Board of Trustees Training Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Subtitle B of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995, approved April
26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321-115; D.C. Official Code § 38-1802.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2205 (D.C. Official Code § 38-1802.05) is amended by adding a new
subsection (f) to read as follows:
“(f) The Board of Trustees of a public charter school shall complete school governance
training consistent with the requirements of section 2214(k).”.
(b) Section 2214 (DC Official Code § 38-1802.14) is amended by adding a new
subsection (k) to read as follows:
“(k) School governance mandatory training. –
“(1) Beginning in School Year 2026-2027, the Board shall, in coordination with
the Office of the State Superintendent as appropriate, offer governance training to all public
charter school Boards of Trustees at no cost to a public charter school or its Board of Trustees
members. The Board shall require each member of a public charter school Board of Trustees to
successfully complete an approved structured training offered pursuant to this subsection
annually and shall require a newly elected or appointed member of a public charter school Board
of Trustees to complete an initial training within 90 days after the member’s election or
appointment to the Board of Trustees. The Board shall designate which topics identified in
paragraph (2) of this subsection are required for a member’s initial training and which are
required for the refresher training.
“(2) At a minimum, the training offered pursuant to this subsection shall include
training on:
“(A) The State and Authorizer Academic Accountability System;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Hiring, management, and evaluation of public charter school
leadership;
“(C) Organizational fiscal management;
“(D) Nonprofit and public charter school governance, including the role of
a fiduciary;
“(E) Obligations of a charter school and the responsibilities of a school
governing body under federal and District laws and regulations; and
“(F) Updates to relevant federal and District laws and regulations.
“(3) The training offered pursuant to this subsection may be administered through
any modality that ensures accessibility and effective participation, as determined by the Board.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3